extensions/2696307_словарь-орфографии-вики/2696307-1.103/dictionaries/ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1122 Y 1
SFX 1122 0 ировавшись .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 ится .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 0 ивайте .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 рами .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 вающийся .
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 0 ицами .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 0 льницей .
SFX 1523 Y 1
SFX 1523 0 щицей .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 анные .
SFX 689 Y 1
SFX 689 0 анный .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 анным .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 истка .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 истке .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 истки .
SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 0 чат .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 чах .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 0 льна .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 льно .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 овскими .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 ывают .
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 0 озами .
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 0 са .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 се .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 ск .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 0 яющий .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ься .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 ору .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 0 оры .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 0 нную .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 ьное .
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 0 ьной .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 ьном .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 щикам .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 емся .
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 0 льщик .
SFX 1963 Y 1
SFX 1963 0 инкою .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 0 ваниям .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 льностей .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ностями .
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 0 лениям .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 0 изировалось .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 щихся .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 тую .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 ищами .
SFX 1884 Y 1
SFX 1884 0 руют .
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 0 дах .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 ающее .
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 0 ающей .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 ающем .
SFX 1778 Y 1
SFX 1778 0 истыми .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 тельные .
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 0 тельный .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 тельным .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 изируйте .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 кать .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 ваюсь .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 нцами .
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 0 анью .
SFX 1235 Y 1
SFX 1235 0 анья .
SFX 1631 Y 1
SFX 1631 0 ываетесь .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 йся .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 нит .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 ниц .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 нию .
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 ния .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 ниными .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 чках .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 овавшийся .
SFX 1738 Y 1
SFX 1738 0 енные .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 енный .
SFX 1737 Y 1
SFX 1737 0 енным .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 ываются .
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 0 ичностей .
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 0 ались .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 альною .
SFX 2600 Y 1
SFX 2600 0 ющимся .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 ывавшая .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 нков .
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 0 нкой .
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 0 дите .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 ющими .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 вающий .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 0 изировавшийся .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 0 изируется .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 вался .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 шься .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 0 ивавшего .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 льницею .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 щицею .
SFX 2082 Y 1
SFX 2082 0 анных .
SFX 1581 Y 1
SFX 1581 0 истку .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 киной .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 иванием .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 льны .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 овкой .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 авшаяся .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 ывала .
SFX 1323 Y 1
SFX 1323 0 ывали .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 ывало .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 ём .
SFX 2870 Y 1
SFX 2870 0 ровались .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 уемся .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 щему .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 нуть .
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 0 ст .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 су .
SFX 1006 Y 1
SFX 1006 0 сы .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 сь .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 ся .
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 0 ывание .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 ывании .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 ываний .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 ьною .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 щиках .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 ствовавшая .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 ваниях .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 имся .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 ировавшему .
SFX 2442 Y 1
SFX 2442 0 лениях .
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 0 авшееся .
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 0 там .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 стого .
SFX 2002 Y 1
SFX 2002 0 изируй .
SFX 2391 Y 1
SFX 2391 0 ельницами .
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 0 цами .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 овские .
SFX 1072 Y 1
SFX 1072 0 овский .
SFX 1486 Y 1
SFX 1486 0 овским .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 ающею .
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 0 нское .
SFX 2515 Y 1
SFX 2515 0 нской .
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 0 нском .
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 0 тельных .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 ировавшую .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 айте .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 0 рскими .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ешь .
SFX 2696 Y 1
SFX 2696 0 рование .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 0 ровании .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 рований .
SFX 2854 Y 1
SFX 2854 0 тиками .
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 0 енных .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 ающего .
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 0 каете .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 инками .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 итов .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 итом .
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 0 онами .
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 0 ска .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 ске .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 ски .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 озам .
SFX 2048 Y 1
SFX 2048 0 ивание .
SFX 2046 Y 1
SFX 2046 0 ивании .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 иваний .
SFX 2384 Y 1
SFX 2384 0 ившаяся .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 нкою .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 ельница .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 0 ельнице .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 0 ничаешь .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 шемся .
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 0 нулся .
SFX 2091 Y 1
SFX 2091 0 ичную .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 льщиков .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 льщиком .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 овать .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 ична .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 ично .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 ваемый .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 изируемся .
SFX 2264 Y 1
SFX 2264 0 авшиеся .
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 0 ируются .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 рские .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 рский .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 рским .
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 0 щимися .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 истые .
SFX 1475 Y 1
SFX 1475 0 истый .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 истым .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 ирована .
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 0 ировано .
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 0 ушка .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 ушке .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 ушки .
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 0 овкою .
SFX 1926 Y 1
SFX 1926 0 аемого .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 ившееся .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 ивалось .
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 0 очное .
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 0 очной .
SFX 1372 Y 1
SFX 1372 0 очном .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 ра .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 ре .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 ри .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 шее .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 шей .
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 0 шек .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 шем .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 она .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 оне .
SFX 1548 Y 1
SFX 1548 0 ёт .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 емое .
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 0 емой .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 емом .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 нная .
SFX 1628 Y 1
SFX 1628 0 ывайся .
SFX 1970 Y 1
SFX 1970 0 ыванию .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 ывания .
SFX 1748 Y 1
SFX 1748 0 ничают .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 ацией .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 ющуюся .
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 0 истками .
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 0 вшейся .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 ованиям .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 шимся .
SFX 1498 Y 1
SFX 1498 0 мам .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 циям .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 0 тах .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 тая .
SFX 2672 Y 1
SFX 2672 0 цевыми .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 изирую .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 изируя .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 евая .
SFX 1478 Y 1
SFX 1478 0 овских .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 ируй .
SFX 2514 Y 1
SFX 2514 0 нскою .
SFX 2809 Y 1
SFX 2809 0 щами .
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 0 ивав .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 ивай .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 ивал .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 еем .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 рованию .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 рования .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 нитесь .
SFX 2007 Y 1
SFX 2007 0 изировать .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 ившую .
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 0 ированное .
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 0 ированной .
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 0 ированном .
SFX 1837 Y 1
SFX 1837 0 лка .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 лке .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 лки .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 ску .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 озах .
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 0 ивайся .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 иванию .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 ивания .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 ельницу .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 ельницы .
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 0 ялась .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 уюсь .
SFX 1049 Y 1
SFX 1049 0 овавшими .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 ичны .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 0 ающимися .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 мте .
SFX 1257 Y 1
SFX 1257 0 ствовать .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 нёшь .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 ское .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ской .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 ском .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 рских .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 новыми .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 0 очными .
SFX 1770 Y 1
SFX 1770 0 истых .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 ированы .
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 0 ушку .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 емтесь .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ов .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 ое .
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 0 оз .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 ой .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 ок .
SFX 2936 Y 1
SFX 2936 0 ол .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 ом .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 0 он .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 стью .
SFX 1367 Y 1
SFX 1367 0 очною .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 овую .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 стами .
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 0 нусь .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 ру .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 ры .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 рь .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 0 рю .
SFX 2428 Y 1
SFX 2428 0 ря .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 шею .
SFX 1532 Y 1
SFX 1532 0 ону .
SFX 1550 Y 1
SFX 1550 0 оны .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 ившиеся .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 емою .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 ываешь .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 0 ничала .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 ничали .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 ничало .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 вавши .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 ациею .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 яйтесь .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 ивавшее .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 0 ивавшей .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 ивавшем .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 изировался .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 ции .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 ций .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 ища .
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 0 ище .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 ованиях .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 изм .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 вшийся .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 ерам .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 мах .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 мая .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 циях .
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 0 изируйся .
SFX 1435 Y 1
SFX 1435 0 очна .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 очно .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 тельниц .
SFX 1365 Y 1
SFX 1365 0 ировавшая .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 ирую .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 ируя .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 ните .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 0 ять .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 ание .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 ании .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 аний .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 0 иваю .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 ивая .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 ирование .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 ировании .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 ирований .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 валась .
SFX 1938 Y 1
SFX 1938 0 еет .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 ствовавшего .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 ающеюся .
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 0 шегося .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 ированною .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 лку .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 ницей .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 иваешь .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 ингам .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 ичная .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 вкам .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 скому .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 шуюся .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 скою .
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 0 чную .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 уем .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 ирующийся .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 ьям .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 стые .
SFX 1588 Y 1
SFX 1588 0 стый .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 стым .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 ьна .
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 0 ьно .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 овав .
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 0 овал .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 ор .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 ою .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 ируете .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 нувши .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 щаяся .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 ствовавши .
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 0 ковый .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 ковым .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 тому .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 остей .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 0 дов .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 0 дой .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 дом .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 овичей .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 0 овичем .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 ываниям .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 тся .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 ивавшею .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 аем .
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 0 нёмте .
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 0 цию .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 ция .
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 0 ищу .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 ерах .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 0 изируешь .
SFX 2579 Y 1
SFX 2579 0 ящую .
SFX 1434 Y 1
SFX 1434 0 очны .
